Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-405
Nebraska Art Collection; composition.

The collection shall be one that is representative of various mediums, styles, and periods of Nebraska artists and shall be representative of Nebraska's ethnic, racial minority, and cultural groups.

Laws 1979, LB 116, § 5.